Utah statutes.
10-6-133.   Property tax levy -- Time for setting -- Computation of total
levy -- Apportionment of proceeds -- Maximum levy.
(1)  Before June 22 of each year, or August 17 in the case of a property tax
rate increase under Sections 59-2-919 through 59-2-923, the governing body of
each city, including charter cities, at a regular meeting or special meeting
called for that purpose, shall by ordinance or resolution set the real and
personal property tax levy for various municipal purposes, but the levy may be
set at an appropriate later date with the approval of the State Tax
Commission.
(2)  In its computation of the total levy, the governing body shall determine
the requirements of each fund for which property taxes are to be levied and
shall specify in its ordinance or resolution adopting the levy the amount
apportioned to each fund.
(3)  The proceeds of the levy apportioned for General Fund purposes shall be
credited as revenue in the General Fund.
(4)  The proceeds of the levy apportioned for special fund purposes shall be
credited to the appropriate accounts in the applicable special funds.
(5)  The combined levies for each city, including charter cities, for all
purposes in any year, excluding the retirement of general obligation bonds and
the payment of any interest, and taxes expressly authorized by law to be
levied in addition, may not exceed .007 per dollar of taxable value of taxable
property.
